Utah statutes.
10-7-7.   Bond issues for water, light, and sewers.

(1)  A city of the first or second class may incur an indebtedness, not exceeding in the aggregate with all other indebtedness 8% of the value of the taxable property in the city, for the purpose of supplying the city with water, artificial light, or sewers, when the works for supplying the water, light, and sewers are owned and controlled by the city.

(2)  A city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or a town may become indebted to an amount not exceeding in the aggregate with all other indebtedness 12% of the value of the taxable property in the city or town for the purpose of supplying the city or town with water, artificial light, or sewers, when the works for supplying the water, light, and sewers are owned and controlled by the city or town.

